Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202052-1901
Nonconsensual
common-law lien, defined.

For purposes of sections
52-1901 to 52-1907, nonconsensual common-law
lien means a document that purports to assert a lien against real or personal
property of any person or entity and:

(1) Is not expressly provided for by a specific state or federal
statute;

(2) Does not depend on the consent of the owner of the real
or personal property affected; and

(3) Is not an equitable or constructive lien imposed by a
state or federal court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 2003, LB 655, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB3, § 3.